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DTC P0134 Oxygen Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0154 Oxygen Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0134
P0154

After the engine is warmed up, front heated oxygen sensor
output does not indicate RICH (more than 0.45 V) even once
when the following conditions continue for 65 sec. or more:
(a) Engine speed: 1,400 rpm or more
(b) Vehicle speed: 25 mph (40 km/h) or more
(c) Throttle valve does not fully closed
(d) 180 sec. or more after starting engine
(e) Engine coolant temperature more than 40˚  C (104˚  F)

(1 trip detection logic)

S Open or short in front heated oxygen sensor circuit
S Front heated oxygen sensor
S Front heated oxygen sensor heater
S EFI or ECD relay
S Air induction system
S Fuel pressure
S PCV hose connection
S PCV valve and hose
S Injector
S Gas leakage on exhaust system
S PCV piping
S Engine control ECU

HINT:
S Bank 1 refers to bank that includes cylinder No. 1.
S Bank 2 refers to bank that does not includes cylinder No. 1.
S Sensor 1 refers to the sensor closer to the engine assembly.
S After confirming DTC P0134 and P0154, check the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor in the

”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL” using the hand−held tester. If output voltage of the
heated oxygen sensor is always less than 0.1 V, heated oxygen sensor circuit may be open or short.

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU uses the heated oxygen sensor to optimize the air−fuel mixture in closed−loop fuel
control. This control helps decrease exhaust emissions by providing the catalyst with a nearly stoichiometric
mixture.
The sensor detects the oxygen level in the exhaust gas and the engine control ECU uses this data to control
the air−fuel ratio. The sensor output voltage ranges from 0 V to 1 V. If the signal voltage is less than 0.4 V,
the air−fuel ratio is LEAN. If the signal voltage is more than 0.55 V, the air−fuel ratio is RICH. If the conditions
for theclosed −loop fuel controlaremetandafteraspecified time −period, thesensor’soutputsignalnever
indicatesRICH, theenginecontrolECUwill conclude that theclosed −loop fuel control ismalfunctioning.The
engine control ECU will illuminate the MIL and a DTC is set.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Allow theengine to idleuntil theECTreaches40 �C (104�F).
(c) Allow the vehicle to run at 60 km/h (38 mph) or more for 3 minutes or more.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Hand−held testeronly:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following ”A/F CON-
TROL” (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(a)PerformACTIVETESTbyhand −held tester (A/FCONTROL).
HINT:
”A/FCONTROL” is theACTIVETESTwhichchanges the injectionvolumeto −12.5%or+25%.

(1)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3on thevehicle.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(4) Select the item ”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL”.
(5) Perform ”A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).

RESULT:
Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25% � richoutput:More than0.5V
−12.5% � leanoutput:Lessthan0.4V
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NOTICE:
However, there isa fewsecondsdelay in thesensor 1 (frontsensor)output.Andthere isamaximum
20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).

The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
theheatedoxygensensors (sensor 1 and2).
For displaying the graph indication, enter ”ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL / USER DATA” then select ”O2S
B1S1 andO2SB 1S2”bypressing ”YES”buttonandpush”ENTER”buttonbeforepressing ”F4”button.
HINT:
S If differentDTCsrelated todifferentsystems terminalE2as theground terminalareoutputsimulta-

neously, terminal E2 may be open.
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewaswarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,etc.at
the time of the malfunction.

S Ahighheatedoxygensensor (sensor 1)voltage (0.5Vormore)couldbecausedbyarichair fuelmix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run rich.

S Alowheatedoxygensensor (sensor 1)voltage (0.4Vor less)couldbecausedbya leanair fuelmix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run lean.
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1 Are there any other codes (besides DTCs P0134 and P0154) being output?

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /

CURRENT CODES.
CHECK:
Read the DTC using the hand−held tester.
RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to

”P0134 and/or P0154” A

”P0134 or P0154” and other DTCs B

HINT:
If any other codes besides P0134 and/or P0154 are output, perform the troubleshooting for those codes first.

B Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI−1 9) .

A

2Connecthand −held tester,andreadvalue forvoltageoutputofheatedoxygen
sensor (bank 1,2sensor 1).

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect the thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Warmup theengineuntil theenginecoolant temperature (ECT) reaches40 ˚ C (104 ˚ F).
(c)Whenusinghand −held tester,enter the followingmenu:DIAGNOSIS /OBD/MOBD/DATALIST /ALL

/O2SB 1 S1 orB2S 1.
CHECK:
Read the voltage output of the heated oxygen sensors when the engine speed is suddenly increased.
HINT:
Quickly accelerate the engine to 4,000 rpm 3 times by using the accelerator pedal.
OK:

Heated oxygen sensor output a RICH signal (0.45 V or more) at least once.

OKGotostep 12.

NG
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3 Check connection of PCV piping.

NG Repair or replace PCV piping.

OK

4 Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor
connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen
sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

HT (H11−1) − +B (H11−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H12−1) − +B (H12−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H13−1) − +B (H13−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H14−1) − +B (H14−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

NG Replace heated oxygen sensor.

OK
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5 Check EFI or ECD relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.
OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition

Usually 10 k� or higher

1 − 3 Apply B+ between
terminals 2 and 4

Below 1 �

NG Replace EFI or ECD relay.

OK
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Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing)

From
Battery EFI or ECD

No. 1 Fuse
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6 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and heated oxygen sensor (bank 1, 2 sensor 1).

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the H11 or H13 heated oxygen sensor con-

nector.
(b) Disconnect the E8 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

OX (H11−3) − OX1A (E8−23) Below 1 �

HT (H11−1) − HT1A (E8−4) Below 1 �

OX (H13−3) − OX2A (E8−22) Below 1 �

HT (H13−1) − HT2A (E8−33) Below 1 �

OX (H11−3) or OX1A (E8−23) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H11−1) or HT1A (E8−4) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H13−3) or OX2A (E8−22) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H13−1) or HT2A (E8−33) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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7 Check whether misfire is occurred or not by monitoring DTC and data list.

NG Perform troubleshooting for misfire
(See page DI−1 30).

OK

8 Check air induction system (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−1 ).

CHECK:
Check the air induction system for vacuum leaks.

NG Repair or replace air induction system.

OK

9 Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−1 ).

CHECK:
Check the fuel pressure (high or low pressure).

NG Check and repair fuel pump, pressure regulator,
fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No. RM630E,
page FI−7).

OK

10 Check injector injection (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−24)

NG Replace injector.

OK
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11 Check exhaust system for gas leakage.

NG Repair or replace exhaust gas leakage point.

OK

Replace heated oxygen sensor (bank 1, 2 sensor 1).

12 Perform confirmation driving pattern (See page DI−1 04).

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern.

Go

13 Are there DTCs P0134 and P0154 being output again?

YES Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).

NO

14 Confirm if vehicle has run out of fuel in past.

NO Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−3) .

YES

DTCs P0134 and P0154 are caused by running out of fuel.


